Massachusetts, session 194th, H2344.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
MGL 40A, Section 3A is amended by addition a new subsection (d): 
Any community which qualifies for any of the safe harbor provisions of M.G.L. 40B, 
shall be exempt from the requirements of this Section 3A.